Florida, session 2026, HB1175.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 553.884, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
553.884 Office surgery suites; safety design standards.—
(1) By January 1, 2027, the commission must establish
within the Florida Building Code and the State Fire Marshal must
establish within the Florida Fire Prevention Code, safety design
standards that allow office surgery suites to provide the
following services or treatment simultaneously for up to six
patients on an outpatient basis:
(a) Treatment for patients that renders the patients
incapable of taking action for self-preservation under emergency
conditions without the assistance of others.
(b) Anesthesia that renders the patients incapable of
taking action for self-preservation under emergency conditions
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1175 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1175 2026 Legislature
without the assistance of others.
(c) Treatment for patients who, due to the nature of their
injury or illness, are incapable of taking action for self-
preservation under emergency conditions without the assistance
of others.
(2) Such standards must be an alternative to the safety
design standards for ambulatory health care occupancies. For
purposes of this section, an "office surgery suite" is that
portion of a physician's office where surgery is performed.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1175 -01-er